Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 1. County Jail

§ 7-16-101.
Persons subject to required work.

The sentencing court may require the following persons to perform work pursuant to W.S.

7-16-101

through

7-16-104

:

Persons sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment in the county jail, whether or not a fine is imposed as a part of the sentence;

Persons committed to jail pursuant to W.S.

6-10-105

for refusal to pay a fine or costs; and

Persons for whom work is imposed as a condition of probation pursuant to W.S. 7-13-304(b).

No person charged with a crime and awaiting the action of the grand jury or awaiting trial shall be required to perform work pursuant to W.S.

7-16-101

through

7-16-104

.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 74, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 33-1701; C.S. 1945, § 10-2901; W.S. 1957, § 7-363; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-701

; Laws 1984, ch. 68, § 1; 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to grand jury, see chapter 5 of this title.

As to continuation of employment during probation, see §

7-13-501

et seq.

§ 7-16-102.
Restrictions; supervision; costs; civil liability.

No prisoner shall be required to perform work more than eight (8) hours in any one (1) calendar day or to work on any legal holiday.

No person shall be required to perform work who is unable to do so due to physical or mental disability.

The court shall direct whether the work shall be performed under the supervision of the county sheriff, the state probation and parole officer or some other responsible person approved by the court. No person shall be directed to perform work unless the court, after consultation with the sheriff or other entity or person to be charged with supervision, determines that adequate staffing is available to provide for the safe and secure supervision of the prisoner.

Any additional expenses, including costs for guarding the prisoner, incurred by a county as a result of allowing a prisoner to perform work shall be paid by the board of county commissioners in which the labor is performed but may be assessed against any financial credit earned by the prisoner under W.S.

7-16-104

. The court may also require that a reasonable sum for room and board be assessed against any credits earned by a prisoner.

The person charged with supervising a prisoner’s work shall keep an accurate record and account of all work performed and all credits received and shall make periodic reports as required by the court.

The court may impose any other reasonable terms or conditions relating to the performance of work by prisoners and probationers, not inconsistent with W.S.

7-16-101

through

7-16-104

.

If any civil action is brought against any sheriff, his undersheriff, deputy, agent or employee, by reason of acts committed or alleged in the performance of necessary duties in connection with the care of a prisoner performing work pursuant to W.S.

7-16-101

through

7-16-104

, the state shall indemnify and hold harmless the officers, agents or employees from all civil liability incurred or adjudged except for liability arising out of willful and wanton or malicious acts. Upon request, the state shall provide legal counsel at state expense to assist in the defense of any action covered by this subsection.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 74, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 33-1702; C.S. 1945, § 10-2902; W.S. 1957, § 7-364; W.S. 1977, §

7-13-702

; Laws 1984, ch. 68, § 1; 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1995, ch. 122, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to state probation and parole officer, see § 7-13-405(b).

As to governmental claims, see chapter 39 of title 1.

As to county sheriffs, see §

18-3-601

et seq.

§ 7-16-103.
Compensation of sheriff.

Except for reimbursement for additional expenses authorized by W.S. 7-16-102(d), a sheriff is not entitled to any extra compensation, fee or reward for supervising a prisoner performing work pursuant to W.S.

7-16-101

through

7-16-104

.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 74, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 33-1703; C.S. 1945, § 10-2903; W.S. 1957, § 7-365; W.S. 1977, § 7-13-703; Laws 1984, ch. 68, § 1; 1987, ch. 157, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to sheriff's salary and fees, see §

18-3-608

.

§ 7-16-104.
Credits.

The sentencing court may reduce the term of a sentence, fine, costs or attorney fees of a prisoner sentenced to imprisonment or placed on probation, for work performed under W.S.

7-16-101

through

7-16-104

.

If a reduction is ordered pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the reduction shall be:

At the rate of one (1) day for each eight (8) hours of work performed under W.S.

7-16-101

through

7-16-104

, provided the reduction in sentence shall not exceed one-half (1/2) of the original sentence;

In an amount equal to the federal minimum hourly wage for each hour of work performed provided that the total amount of reduction in the fine, costs or attorney fees shall not exceed one-half (1/2) of the total amount of the fine, costs and attorney fees.

The court shall direct whether the credits under subsection (b) of this section shall apply against the prisoner’s term of imprisonment, his fine, court costs, attorney fees or other fees imposed by the court.

A person committed to county jail for refusal to pay a fine or costs shall, in addition to the credit allowed by W.S.

6-10-105

, be granted a credit against his fine or costs in an amount equal to the federal minimum hourly wage for each hour of work performed.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 74, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 33-1704; C.S. 1945, § 10-2904; W.S. 1957, § 7-366; W.S. 1977, § 7-13-704; Laws 1984, ch. 68, § 1; 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1989, ch. 89, § 1.

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1927, ch. 74, § 5, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.